Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.240

Application of uniform disciplinary act.

The uniform disciplinary act, chapter 18.130 RCW, shall govern the issuance and denial of credentials, unauthorized practice, and the discipline of persons credentialed under this chapter. The secretary shall act as the disciplinary authority under this chapter. Disciplinary action shall be initiated against a person credentialed under this chapter in a manner consistent with the responsibilities and duties of the medical program director under whom such person is responsible.

[ 1992 c 128 s 5.]